Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1789XS (6) 91 dg/ko S.F. 434 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 237A.15 Child care solutions fund. 1 1. For purposes of this section: 2 a. âChild care workerâ means a person employed by a child 3 care provider and whose primary duties involve the provision of 4 child care to children in this state. 5 b. âCommunityâ means a geographic area designated by the 6 department under subsection 4. 7 c. âFundâ means the child care solutions fund created under 8 subsection 2. 9 2. A child care solutions fund is created within the state 10 treasury under the control of the department. The fund shall 11 consist of all of the following: 12 a. Moneys appropriated by the general assembly for the 13 purposes of this section. 14 b. Interest attributable to the investment of moneys in the 15 fund. 16 c. Moneys from gifts, devises, donations, and grants that 17 are intended to be used for the purposes of this section. 18 3. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the department 19 for distribution to communities. Distributions shall provide 20 a state match of two dollars for every one dollar of private 21 investment a community obtains for the purpose of increasing 22 the wages of child care workers within the community. 23 4. a. The department shall establish eligibility 24 requirements for a geographic area to qualify for designation 25 as a community, and requirements for a geographic area to 26 maintain the community designation. 27 b. The department shall continue to designate communities 28 until the entire geographic area of the state is within a 29 community. 30 5. On or before January 1 of each year, the department shall 31 submit a report to the general assembly detailing all of the 32 following for the immediately preceding fiscal year: 33 a. The amount each community received from the fund. 34 b. The amount each community spent from the moneys the 35 -1- LSB 1789XS (6) 91 dg/ko 1/ 4 S.F. 434 community received from the fund, including the amount spent 1 on increasing the wages of child care workers within the 2 community, and the amount spent on administrative costs. 3 c. The number of child care providers that each community 4 supported with moneys from the fund. 5 d. The number of existing child care workers retained by 6 child care providers within each community as a result of 7 moneys the community received from the fund. 8 e. The number of new child care workers hired by child 9 care providers within each community as a result of moneys the 10 community received from the fund. 11 f. The number of additional child care slots created within 12 each community as a result of child care workers described 13 under paragraphs âdâ and âeâ . 14 g. The number of private entities that contributed private 15 investment for state match under this section. 16 h. The number of private entities that pledged to contribute 17 private investment for state match under this section in the 18 immediately succeeding fiscal year. 19 6. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 20 to administer this section. 21 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ CHILD 22 CARE WAGE ENHANCEMENT PROJECT CONTINUATION. The department of 23 health and human services shall use the moneys in the child 24 care solutions fund created in section 237A.15 to continue to 25 provide state matching moneys to communities that received 26 funds due to the communityâs participation in the departmentâs 27 child care wage enhancement project during the fiscal year 28 beginning July 1, 2024, and ending June 30, 2025. 29 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ CHILD 30 CARE SOLUTIONS FUND. There is appropriated from the general 31 fund of the state to the department of health and human 32 services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 33 June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 34 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 35 -2- LSB 1789XS (6) 91 dg/ko 2/ 4 S.F. 434 For deposit in the child care solutions fund created in 1 section 237A.15: 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,000,000 3